California statutes. Public Utilities Code
15762.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition
 prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The election officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

15763.

The election shall be held and conducted, the returns canvassed, and the result declared by the board of supervisors in the manner provided by general law for such elections in the particulars in which provision is made therefor, and in all other respects in the manner provided by law for the holding of special elections within such counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15764.

The proposition submitted at the election shall be stated upon the ballot substantially as follows: “Shall ________ public utility district (naming it) be organized pursuant to Division 7 of the Public Utilities Code.Yes ◻No ◻”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15765.

Within five days after the result of the election is declared, and the order is made where required, the chairman of the board of supervisors of each county in which the election is held shall make and execute a certificate, signed by him as such official and authenticated under the seal of the county, setting forth the proposition submitted to the electors, the fact of such submission, and the result of the election as so declared. The certificate shall be made and executed in duplicate, and shall be delivered in duplicate without delay to the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed district, or the greater part of its population, is situated, or to the clerk
 of such board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of the District [15791. - 15798.]

15791.

The board of supervisors receiving the certificates delivered pursuant to Section 15765 shall meet and examine them within three weeks after all the elections are held. If it appears from the certificates that a majority of the votes cast at the election in each unincorporated territory in which such elections are held is in favor of the incorporation of the district, the board of supervisors shall so declare and shall state by order entered in its minutes the name and boundaries of the district, and that the district is formed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15792.

If it appears from the certificates that a majority of the electors voting at the election has voted against the formation of the district, the proceedings shall fail entirely.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15793.

When the board of supervisors has completed its examination of the certificates, and has made the order provided in Section 15791, it shall forthwith attach together the duplicate certificates in two rolls, each roll to contain one of each of the certificates and a copy of the order of the board of supervisors, duly certified under the hand and official seal of the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15794.

The board of supervisors shall immediately deposit one roll for filing in the office of the Secretary of State, and cause the other roll to be recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which any part of the district is situated and filed in the office of the county elections official of the county in which the district, or the greater part of its population, is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 91.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15795.

Upon the receipt of the duplicate roll the Secretary of State shall issue his certificate reciting that it is filed in his office and that the public utility district, naming it, is incorporated as a district pursuant to this division. The certificate shall be forwarded to the board of supervisors and by it held and delivered to the board of directors of the district after the election and organization of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15796.

No charge shall be made by either the Secretary of State or any county recorder or county elections official for the services required of him or her under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15797.

From and after the date the duplicate roll is filed with the Secretary of State, the district is incorporated as a public utility district, with all the rights, privileges, and powers set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15798.

The board may change the name of the district by adoption of an ordinance changing the name of the district and by giving notification of the name change to the State Controller, the State Board of Equalization, and the board of supervisors of each county which has land within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 446.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Contest of Incorporation [15821. - 15822.]

15821.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of any district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of incorporation is sought to be denied shall be commenced within 20 days after the date of the certificate of incorporation, otherwise the incorporation and the legal existence of the district, and all proceedings in respect thereto, shall be held valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15822.

Any such contest shall be brought in the superior court of the county where the district, or the greater part of its population, is situated. If more than one contest is pending they shall be consolidated and tried together. The court having jurisdiction shall speedily try the contest and determine upon the hearing whether the election was fairly conducted and in substantial compliance with this division, and enter its judgment accordingly. Either party to the record may appeal within 30 days from the entry of judgment, and the appeal shall be heard and determined by the Supreme Court within 60 days from the filing of the notice of appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Verification Deputies [15841. - 15846.]

15841.

Verification deputies shall be qualified electors residing within the territory of the district or the proposed district for which they are appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15842.

Verification deputies required to verify signatures to petitions for the formation of a district, or to certificates or petitions nominating candidates for election to the first board of directors of newly formed districts, shall be appointed by the county elections official of any county in which the territory of the district is situated, and verification deputies required for any other purpose after the formation of a district shall be appointed by the clerk of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

15843.

Appointments of verification deputies shall be made upon written application of not less than five (5) nor more than ten (10) qualified electors of any territorial unit or units of the district, or the proposed district, as the case may be. The application shall state that the signers desire the appointment of the person whose name and address is given therein as a verification deputy for the purpose of taking the oaths of signers of petitions or certificates in the matter of ________.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15844.

Verification deputies need not use a seal, and shall not have power to administer oaths for any purpose other than that for which they are appointed. Their appointment shall continue for ninety (90) days only from the date of appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15845.

Verification deputies shall not be paid, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, out of the county treasury or the treasury of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15846.

Before appointment a verification deputy shall make and file with the clerk appointing him an oath as to his age, place of residence, occupation, and whether or not he is a qualified elector residing within the territory of the district, or the proposed district, for which he is appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of Districts [15951. - 16196.]



  ARTICLE 1. Election of Directors [15951. - 15976.]

15951.

At an election held in the district on the next established election date not less than 74 days after its formation a board of directors shall be elected, to consist of as many members as there are territorial units in the district and as many additional members, not less than three nor more than four, as are required to constitute a board composed of an odd number of directors. Where the district lies entirely in one county the number of directors shall be three, elected at large.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

15952.

A director at large shall be a resident and qualified elector of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15953.

All unincorporated territories situated in the same county and included within the district shall be regarded as an entirety and as a territorial unit of the district. Each unit having a population of at least 5,000 is entitled to one director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15954.

Candidates for the office of director to be elected by a unit shall be nominated from each such territorial unit, and the remaining number of directors shall be nominated from the district at large.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15955.

Each directorship is a separate office for the purpose of nomination and election, and for the filling of vacancies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15956.

(a) Candidates for directors at large shall be designated in all declarations of candidacy, nominating certificates, and on all official election ballots as candidates for a particular directorship at large, in accordance with the declarations of candidacy which the candidates have filed with the county elections official or the clerk of the district, as the case may be. Each office of director at large shall be designated as “director at large” number one, number two, number three, or number four, there being as many numbers as there are directors at large to be elected.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other provision of this article, the board of directors of a district may adopt an ordinance that requires that
 candidates for directors at large need not designate a numbered office. The ordinance shall instead require that the candidates receiving the greatest number of votes districtwide as there are directors to be elected shall be elected to the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   (SB 673)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

15957.

Candidates for director from the several territorial units entitled to one director each shall be designated in all declarations of candidacy, nominating certificates, and on all official election ballots as candidates for director from ____ unit, giving the name or other designation of the unit entitled to the office of director in accordance with the declarations of candidacy which the candidates have filed with the proper clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15958.

If only one unit of unincorporated territory is contained in the district, it may be designated as “the unincorporated territorial unit.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15959.

If two or more units of unincorporated territory are contained in the district, they shall be numbered, named, and designated by the board of supervisors in charge of the election of the first board of directors, and subsequently from time to time by the board of directors of the district, as unincorporated territorial unit number one, number two, number three, and so forth, there being as many numbers as there are units in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15960.

The board of supervisors shall number, name, and designate each territorial unit of the district by ordinance at a regular or special meeting after the formation of the district, and in time to permit publication and taking effect of the ordinance before the earliest time when nominating certificates and declarations of candidacy for the board of directors may be filed. The ordinance shall remain in force until the board of directors of the district, by ordinance, shall number, name, and designate the territorial units.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15961.

Designations of directors by name or number have no significance whatever after election and qualification of the directors or after appointment and qualification of a director appointed to fill a vacancy, but merely fix the designation and status of each such office as a separate office for the purpose of nomination and election thereto, or for filling a vacancy. Sections 15953 to 15960, inclusive, apply to the election of the first board of directors of the district, as well as to all elections of directors held by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15961.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of the division, the candidates for director of any district that is wholly or partially within the County of Placer may be elected at large, by wards, or from wards upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance to that effect by the board of directors of the district, subject to approval of the board of supervisors, or as a part of a change of organization or a reorganization conducted pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000, Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) A resolution or ordinance that divides a district into wards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall describe the boundaries of the wards so that the wards shall be as nearly equal in population as may be.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “By wards” means the election of members of the board of directors by voters of the ward alone.

(2) “From wards” means the election of members of the board of directors who are residents of the ward from which they are elected by the voters of the entire district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

15961.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the candidates for director of any district that is wholly or partially within the County of San Diego may be elected at large or by subdistricts upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance to that effect by the board of directors of the district, subject to approval of the board of supervisors, or as a part of a change of organization or a reorganization conducted pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) A resolution or ordinance that divides a district into subdistricts adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall describe the boundaries of the subdistricts so that the subdistricts shall be as nearly equal in population as may be.

(c) As used in this section, “by subdistricts” means the election of members of the board of directors by voters of the subdistrict alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (SB 927)   Effective August 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

15962.

The population of each unit of unincorporated territory within the district shall be determined at the time of calling the election of the first board of directors by the board of supervisors calling the election and shall be stated in the ordinance calling the election and in the notice of the election. The determination shall continue in force until set aside by the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15963.

The board of directors shall determine the boundaries of each unit of unincorporated territory within the district pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

15965.

The election of directors shall be held in the unincorporated territory included within the district and shall be called by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district, or the greater part of its population, is situated, and shall be called, held, and conducted, the returns canvassed, and the result declared by the board of supervisors in the manner and form provided by law for special elections within the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15966.

(a) Not less than 30 days prior to the election, any five or more electors in the district may file with the board of directors a petition requesting that the names of certain persons specified in the petition be placed upon the ballot as candidates for the office of director at large.

(b) Not less than 30 days prior to the election, any five or more electors of a territorial unit may file with the board of directors a petition requesting that the name of a designated person specified in the petition be placed upon the ballot as candidate for the office of director from the territorial unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

15967.

A certificate of election shall be issued by the board of supervisors to each person elected and declared elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15968.

Immediately after receiving his or her certificate of election and before assuming the duties of office, each director shall take and subscribe an official oath and file it in the office of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 617, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

15969.

All official oaths shall be in the form provided by law for official oaths of county officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 617, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

15970.

If a person elected fails to qualify, the office shall be filled as if there were a vacancy in the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15971.

Elections of directors after election of the first board shall be called and held by the board of directors, and shall be called, held, and conducted, nominations for the office of director made, the returns canvassed, and the result declared by the board as provided in Article 6 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15972.

The board of directors of a district which lies entirely within one county may submit to the qualified electors, at a general election or a special election called for that purpose, a proposition to increase the number of directors from three to five. By initiative ordinance the electors of such a district may adopt legislation providing for the increase of the number of directors from three to five. The initiative proceedings shall be conducted in all respects as prescribed by general law for the initiative by electors of counties. If a majority of the electors voting at the election vote in favor of the proposition, the district shall have five directors elected at large.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15973.

Within 30 days after an increase in the number of directors has been authorized, the board of directors shall appoint two qualified electors of the district to serve as members of the board until the next biennial election, at which there shall be elected two directors in addition to the number previously authorized. After the directors elected at the biennial election have qualified, they shall meet and classify themselves so that one shall hold office for two years and the other for four years. Thereafter, there shall be elected at each biennial district election a number of directors, corresponding to the number whose terms expire, who shall hold office for four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

15973.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 15951, 15972, and 15973, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single public utility district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated district, or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a), whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals the number of members permitted by the principal act of the consolidated or reorganized district, or any larger number as may be specified by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated district or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a) at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(d) For the purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Consolidation” means consolidation, as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code.

(2) “District” or “special district” means district or special district, as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code.

(3) “Reorganization” means reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 172, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15974.

Notwithstanding Section 15952 or any other provision of this division, each member of the board of directors of the Johnsville Public Utility District in Plumas County, whether elected or appointed, shall be either a voter of the district or an owner of land within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

15975.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, candidates for director of the Georgetown Divide Public Utility District may be elected by wards upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance to this effect by the board of directors of the district dividing the district into wards and fixing the boundaries thereof, subject to approval of the board of supervisors. The boundaries shall be fixed such that the wards shall be as nearly equal in population as may be, and the board of supervisors shall approve the boundaries fixed by the board of directors if it so finds.

(b) Nomination papers may be circulated only within the ward from which the candidate is to be elected.

(c) The wards shall be reapportioned subject to the approval of the board of supervisors after each federal decennial census.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 63, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15976.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, the Board of Directors of the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District shall consist of five members, elected at large. Each member of the board, including a member appointed to fill a vacancy, shall be a resident and qualified elector of the district.

If the Kirkwood Meadows Public Utility District is not incorporated on or before March 1, 1986, this section is repealed on that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   Note: Repeal condition failed; the district was incorporated on Dec. 4, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Terms and Compensation of Directors [16001. - 16003.]

16001.

On the first Tuesday after their election and qualification, the directors shall meet and classify themselves by lot, so that the largest possible minority shall hold office for two years, and a majority for four years. Thereafter at each biennial district election their successors shall be elected for the term of four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

(a) Each member of the board may receive the compensation that the board by ordinance provides, not exceeding four thousand eight hundred dollars ($4,800) a year.

(b) (1) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each of its members receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of service. A member of the board shall not receive compensation for more than 10 days of service in a month.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a “day of service” means any of the following:

(A) A meeting conducted pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(B) Representation of the district at a public event, if that representation has been previously approved at a meeting of the board and the member delivers a written report regarding the member’s representation to the board at the board meeting immediately following the public event.

(C) Representation of the district at a public meeting or a public hearing conducted by another public agency, if that representation has been previously approved at a meeting of the board and the member delivers a written report regarding the member’s representation to the board at the board meeting immediately following the public meeting or public hearing.

(D) Representation of the district at a meeting of a public benefit nonprofit corporation on whose board the district has membership if that representation has been previously approved at a meeting of the district’s board and the member delivers a written report regarding the member’s representation to the board at the board meeting immediately following the corporation’s meeting.

(E) Participation in a training program on a topic that is directly related to the district if that representation has been previously approved at a meeting of the board and the member delivers a written report regarding the member’s participation to the board at the board meeting immediately following the training program.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the board of directors of a water district, as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code, may increase the amount of compensation that may be received by members of the board by ordinance adopted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20200) of Division 10 of the Water Code.

(d) The board may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that its members receive their actual and necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred while on official business. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(e) A member of the board may waive any or all of the payments permitted by this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a member’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 213, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

A vacancy in the office of director shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties of Directors [16031. - 16044.]

16031.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, the powers of the district shall be exercised by the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16032.

The board of directors shall choose one of its members president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16033.

The president shall sign all contracts on behalf of the district and perform such other duties as may be imposed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16034.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional services required by the district, the board, or any officers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16035.

At the first meeting of the board, after the board has qualified and organized, it shall appoint the clerk, accountant, general manager, and treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16036.

In lieu of appointing a treasurer, the board may elect that the duties of treasurer be performed by the treasurer of the county in which the district, or the greater part of its population, is situated. Whenever the board by ordinance so determines, such duties shall be performed by the county treasurer. The ordinance shall also prescribe the manner in which money is to be drawn out of the various funds belonging to the district in the hands of the treasurer. The treasurer shall be served with a certified copy of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16037.

The board may consolidate two or more offices in the same person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16038.

The board may provide for an assistant to any officer of the district who may perform the acts his principal may perform, when authorized so to do by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16039.

At the first meeting after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall render and immediately cause to be published a verified statement of the financial condition of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16040.

The financial statement shall show particularly the receipts and disbursements since the publication of the last preceding statement and of the last preceding fiscal year and the source of such receipts and the purpose of such disbursements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16041.

Publication of the financial statement shall be made pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district, or if there is no such newspaper, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in a county where any part of the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

16042.

A neglect or refusal of the board to comply with Sections 16601 to 16614, inclusive, 16644 to 16659, inclusive, and 16467 is cause for removal from office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16043.

No director or other officer of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived from it. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor and a director or officer convicted shall forfeit his office, and shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 363.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

16044.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meetings and Legislation [16071. - 16084.]

16071.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings and shall provide for the time and place of holding meetings and the manner in which special meetings may be called. All legislative sessions of the board, whether regular or special, are open to the public. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16072.

The board shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion. The ayes and noes shall be taken upon the passage of all ordinances, resolutions, or motions and entered upon the journal of the proceedings of the board. No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall be passed or become effective without the affirmative votes of at least a majority of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

16073.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be:

“Be it enacted by the board of directors of _______ public utility district:”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16074.

All resolutions and ordinances shall be signed by the president of the board and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16075.

No ordinance passed by the board takes effect less than 30 days after its passage. At least one week before the expiration of the said 30 days copies of the ordinance shall be posted by the clerk at three public places in the district, and if there is a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district, the ordinance shall be published in the newspaper pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

16076.

An order entered in the minutes of the board that an ordinance has been duly posted and published is prima facie proof of such posting and publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16077.

All tax levies for a purpose other than interest or sinking fund payments shall be first authorized by the board by ordinance when the amount proposed to be raised by a tax levy exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 709, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16078.

During the 30 days following passage of an ordinance pursuant to Section 16077 a petition, signed by qualified voters of the district equal to 10 percent of the entire vote cast within the district for all candidates for Governor at the last preceding general election at which a Governor was voted for, protesting against the passage of the ordinance may be presented to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16079.

Immediately upon receipt of a petition submitted pursuant to Section 16078 the board shall cause the clerk of the district to examine and verify the signatures, and to certify the result to the board within 10 days. If the petition is found insufficient, the clerk shall certify to the number of additional signatures of qualified electors required to make the petition sufficient, and the petition may be amended by a supplemental petition filed within 10 days from the date of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16080.

Within 10 days after the filing of a supplemental petition, the clerk shall examine it and certify to the result of his examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16081.

An ordinance is suspended from going into operation until the examination, verification, and certification are completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16082.

If a petition, or petition as amended, is certified to be sufficient the ordinance is suspended from going into operation and the board shall reconsider it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16083.

If the board does not entirely repeal the ordinance upon reconsideration, it shall submit the ordinance to a vote of the electors at a general district election or at a special district election called for the purpose, and the ordinance shall not become operative unless approved by a majority of the voters voting upon it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16084.
